                              436 of 999 DOCUMENTS

             Copyright © 1984 Florida State University Law Review.

                        Florida State University Law Review

                                  SUMMER, 1984

                           12 Fla. St. U.L. Rev. 339

LENGTH: 14013 words

COMMENT: THE MEDICAL STAFF PRIVILEGES PROBLEM IN FLORIDA

NAME: Thomas Katheder

TEXT:
 [*339]  I.  Introduction

   It is now well recognized that a physician's access to a hospital for the
health care of his or her patients is indispensable in view of the enormously
expensive equipment, continually upgraded medical technology, and professional
support staff available in the modern hospital.  n1 Medical staff privileges at
one or more hospitals or similar health care facilities are essential to the
professional and economic survival of most physicians, particularly specialists.
n2 Indeed, one author, a physician-lawyer, remarked that "[a] physician without
privileges is almost certain to become a physician without patients."  n3
Consequently, when staff privileges are denied, terminated, or suspended,
physicians fight back with a vengeance by bringing suits against the hospital,
its governing board, and even their own peers on the hospital's medical staff.
n4 These suits occur  [*340]  in the form of actions alleging state  n5 and
federal  n6 antitrust violations, substantive and procedural due process errors,
n7 defamation,  n8 federal civil rights violations,  n9 conspiracy,  n10 breach
of contractual obligations,  n11 and tortious interference with contractual and
business relationships,  n12 among many other theories of recovery and relief.

   The threat of these suits, which are now well established in voluminous case
law and legal literature,  n13 significantly deters most hospitals from taking
any adverse action with respect to the medical privileges of one of their staff
without well-grounded and verifiable justification.  But the concomitant
exposure to suits by aggrieved  [*341]  former patients blaming the hospital for
its negligent review or retention of an impaired or inadequate physician forces
the hospital into the treacherous, if untenable, position of having to navigate
between potentially monstrous liabilities reminiscent of Scylla and Charybdis.
n14

    [*342]  The purpose of this comment is to explore the medical staff
privileges controversy in Florida, which hitherto has not been examined in any
comprehensive manner.  This is truly unfortunate, particularly because certain
recent Florida decisions regarding medical staff privileges are patently
incorrect and in direct contravention of Florida statutory law, as we shall see.
This analysis of the medical privileges problem in Florida will include numerous
useful references to authorities addressing certain troublesome aspects of this
problem in other jurisdictions, not only by way of comparison, but also with a
view towards assisting the practitioner whose usual metier is not what could be
described under the amorphous ascription: "hospital law."

   II.  Background: Public-Private Distinction

   The traditional rule in most jurisdictions has been that a "public" hospital
is constrained by, among other things, substantive and procedural due process
requirements in dealings with its medical staff, while a "private" hospital, so
long as it does not violate its own internal bylaws,  n15 is free to take
adverse action against the privileges of one of its medical staff essentially at
will.  n16 In West  [*343]  Coast Hospital Association v. Hoare,  n17 the
Florida Supreme Court accepted the following distinction between private and
public hospitals:

   A private hospital is one founded and maintained by private persons or a
corporation, the state or municipality having no voice in the management or
control of its property or the formation of rules for its government.  . . .  A
hospital . . . endowed by the government for general charity is a public
corporation; and a public hospital may be defined in general as an institution
owned by the public and devoted chiefly to public uses and purposes.  n18

   With this definition in mind, the court in Hoare recognized that a private
hospital may in reality be supported by state and local funds and that it is an
entity affected with a public purpose, but the court concluded nevertheless
that, absent legislative enactment, the governing authorities of private
hospitals have virtually unbridled discretion to grant and control the
privileges of their medical staffs.  n19 Similarly, the Third District Court of
Appeal, in Monyek v. Parkway General Hospital, Inc.,  n20 rejected a physician's
[*344]  argument that a private hospital could be considered "quasi-public" and
hence not immune from judicial review with respect to its medical staff
decisions.  Following the supreme courts' lead in the Hoare decision, the Monyek
court refused to deem a private hospital as quasi-public even in the face of
allegations that fifty percent of the hospital's patients received Medicare
benefits and that part of the land used by the hospital was donated by the City
of North Miami Beach.  n21

   Even when the Florida courts do consider a hospital a public institution, and
therefore subject to substantive and procedural due process, hospital boards are
regarded as having "great discretion" in dealing with medical staff privileges:
n22

   Usually, the [public] hospital's discretion is limited only by the
constitutional requirement that the standards for privileges be reasonably
related to furthering the goal of providing high quality patient care, that the
power of the hospital not be exercised in an unreasonably arbitrary and
capricious manner and that the decisions of the hospital be subject to judicial
review.  n23

   In affording substantial deference to public hospital boards in their
decisions concerning medical privileges, the Florida Supreme Court in particular
has staunchly followed a posture which could well be described by the oft-quoted
injunction: "Courts must not attempt to take on the escutcheon of Caduceus."
n24 Early decisions emphasized that the mere fact that a given hospital was
public rather than private conferred no special right of access upon taxpaying
citizen-physicians,  n25 and that medical practice in public hospitals was a
"privilege rather than a right."  n26 The supreme court's last pronouncement in
this area held that public hospitals are essentially exempt from the usual
requirement that professional or occupational licensing authorities have precise
and specific standards of competency and of review.  By way of explanation
[*345]  for this broad latitude, the court stated: "Detailed description of
[physician misconduct] is concededly impossible, perhaps even undesirable in
view of rapidly shifting standards of medical excellence and the fact that a
human life may be and quite often is involved in the ultimate decision of the
board."  n27

   It should be noted that while Florida courts have supported a sharp
public-private distinction among hospitals, other jurisdictions have departed
from this rule, largely because of judicial distaste for the seemingly excessive
and hence potentially unfair power private hospitals have over their medical
staffs.  A few states, most notably California,  n28 Hawaii,  n29 and New
Jersey,  n30 have refused to follow this distinction and, consequently, subject
medical staff decisions of private hospitals to thorough judicial scrutiny.

   California courts, for instance, abolished the public-private distinction
based upon their interpretation of legislative enactment and what is apparently
a California common law notion that a private entity lacks absolute discretion
to deprive one of a substantial right.  n31

   The Supreme Court of New Jersey, on the other hand, looked to that state's
common law to deem a private hospital "quasi-public." The court stated in
Greisman v. Newcomb Hospital: [W]hile the managing officials [of a private
hospital] may have discretionary powers in the selection of the medical staff,
those powers are deeply imbedded in public aspects, and are rightly viewed, for
policy reasons . . ., as fiduciary powers to be exercised reasonably and for the
public good.  n32

   Other courts have followed the lead of California, New Jersey, and Hawaii in
finding that private hospitals, given their public functions and public funding,
are really quasi-public and hence subject to judicial review in their dealings
with their medical staffs.  n33 Some courts, expressly under the influence of
the growing  [*346]  minority of jurisdictions abandoning the public-private
dichotomy, have adopted what amounts to a hybrid approach between absolute
discretion and quasi-public status, thereby subjecting the private hospital to
limited judicial review typically to ensure that professional criteria are
neither imposed nor applied arbitrarily, capriciously, or unreasonably.  n34

   Although the specific reasons offered by the jurisdictions which have
abandoned the public-private dichotomy vary somewhat in scope and character,
n35 all appear to share a fundamental recognition that the absoluteness inherent
in such a dichotomy is unrealistic and Manichaean because

   in this modern era of technical and therefore expensive health care, it is
almost impossible for a hospital to be completely private in its ownership,
operation and funding.  Government grants are necessary for the survival of the
modern hospital and the concommitant [sic] regulation by the government is
increasingly pervasive.  It is this local, state and federal assistance and
involvement with formally private hospitals that provides the basis on which a
court could decide that public involvement has become so great that the private
hospital should be subjected to public treatment.  n36

    [*347]  A phenomenon directly related to judicial recognition of the fallacy
behind the public-private distinction was the appearance during the 1970's of
state and particularly federal  n37 court decisions holding that certain
characteristics of private hospitals, especially heavy state and federal
funding,  n38 rendered them state actors for purposes of the fifth and
fourteenth amendments.  This state action designation in turn implicated due
process guarantees in decisions by private hospitals on medical privileges.
Thus, for instance, until very recently the rule in the Fourth Circuit was that
the mere receipt of Hill-Burton funds  n39 constituted state action such that
otherwise private hospitals must act in accordance with federal precepts of due
process.  n40 But this perception of the constitutional impact of Hill-Burton
and similar funding has been rejected in every other federal circuit that has
confronted the issue, and the former view of the Fourth Circuit  n41 is almost
certainly incorrect in  [*348]  light of the United States Supreme Court's
holdings in Rendell-Baker v. Kohn  n42 and Blum v. Yaretsky,  n43 which were
both decided by the Court on the same day.

   In Blum, the Court looked at private nursing homes participating in a state
program which provided Medicaid assistance to eligible people receiving care in
those homes.  The Court held that although a substantial ream of state and
federal regulations controlled the program, the private nursing homes were not
state actors with respect to their internal decisions regarding the variable
levels of eligibility of those receiving nursing care.  n44 The Supreme Court
also noted that the decision to discharge or to refer the patients to lower
levels of care was a medical judgment which could not be attributed to the state
because it was rendered "in accordance with professional canons of ethics,
rather than dictated by any rule of conduct imposed by the State."  n45 This
remark bears significant relevance for the governing boards of private hospitals
, which are typically composed of laymen who rely heavily on the advice and
recommendations of the hospital's medical staff in their decisions affecting
medical privileges.

   In Rendell-Baker, the receipt by a privately operated school for maladjusted
high school students of public funds accounting for at least ninety percent of
its operating budget did not transform the school into a person acting under
color of state law.  n46 Not surprisingly,  [*349]  federal court decisions
since Blum and Rendell-Baker have soundly rejected assertions that private
hospitals receiving huge amounts of state and federal funding are either acting
under color of state law or operating as state entities under the mandates of
the fourteenth amendment.  n47

   III.  Florida Statutory Imposition of JCAH Standards

   A.  Outline of the JCAH

   In 1975, the Florida legislature enacted section 395.065, Florida Statutes,
which set forth the criteria by which the medical staff of any licensed hospital
could control the staff privileges of its members.  n48 This  [*350]  statute's
current version, section 395.0115, with minor changes from the original,  n49
authorizes the governing board of any "licensed facility" (hence including both
private and public hospitals) to "suspend, deny, revoke, or curtail the staff
privileges" of any physician for "good cause" after considering the
recommendations of its medical staff.  n50 The statute then gives nonexclusive
illustrations of "good cause," which include: incompetence, habitual and
dangerous addiction to intoxicants or drugs, an adjudication of medical
malpractice liability, and mental or physical impairment.  n51 The procedures
required for both public and private hospitals in taking adverse action with
respect to staff privileges "shall comply with the standards outlined" by, among
other organizations, the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Hospitals (JCAH).
n52 Finally, subdivision 2 of section 395.0115 immunizes the hospital, its
governing board and its individual members, and the medical staff or other
disciplinary body "for any action taken in good faith and without malice in
carrying out the provisions of this section."  n53 We shall hold any discussion
of this immunity; for now, let us proceed to briefly review the JCAH.

    [*351]  The JCAH is a private, nonprofit corporation founded in 1951 which
provides accreditation services primarily for public and private hospitals but
also for other health related facilities.  n54 JCAH accreditation is
theoretically voluntary, and the JCAH does not view accreditation as a scheme of
public regulation, but rather regards itself as a private quality control
consultant paid by and responsible to the health care industry.  n55 The
hospital or other facility must request of its own volition an accreditation
survey by the JCAH staff, who analyze and record the survey results and then
recommend their decision for or against accreditation to a subcommittee of the
JCAH Board of Commissioners, the organization's governing body.  n56 JCAH
accreditation follows only upon the facility's substantial compliance with JCAH
standards overall, although a facility need not comply substantially with every
JCAH standard.  n57 As Professor Jost explains, JCAH accreditation is only
voluntary in the de jure sense, since "hospital accreditation is either
explicitly or implicitly a requirement for participation in many private or
public licensing, certification and financing programs."  n58 Specifically, for
instance, JCAH accreditation essentially results in automatic qualification,
referred to as "deemed" certification status, of a health care facility for
participation in the Medicare program, thus supplanting the requirement
otherwise for state health departments to survey hospitals in order to assess
their compliance with Medicare regulations.  n59

   Similarly, according to Professor Jost, thirty-eight states have, "to varying
degrees," also "incorporated JCAH standards or accreditation decisions into
their licensing programs for health care institutions."  n60 Florida is one of
these states which specifically accommodates JCAH hospital standards in the
state's hospital licensing program.  Section 395.006, for example, requires the
Florida Department of Health and Rehabilitative Services (HRS) to "accept, in
lieu of its own periodic inspections for licensure, the survey  [*352]  or
inspection of an accrediting organization"  n61 (which by statutory definition
includes the JCAH  n62 ), so long as the facility's accreditation is not
provisional and provided that the facility releases and sends to HRS the
accreditation organization's survey.  n63 In sum, the JCAH is a private entity
which has had and continues to have "a significant impact on the development of
institutional medical care in America, and continues to play a major role in
determining the nature of that care."  n64

   B.  JCAH Medical Staff Standards and Due Process

   We may now ask just what is meant by the Florida statutory mandate that the
"procedures" used for adverse action vis-a-vis a physician's staff privileges
must comply with the "standards outlined" by the JCAH.  n65 The standards
outlined by the JCAH are those found in the now annually updated JCAH
Accreditation Manual for Hospitals and the procedures used are those revealed in
the Manual's chapter entitled "Medical Staff."  n66 The chapter on the Medical
Staff is notable for its distinct lack of anything resembling a model code of
staff bylaws, something formerly attempted by the JCAH but since abandoned.  n67
In fact, the chapter on the Medical Staff for the 1985 edition of the
Accreditation Manual for Hospitals is somewhat more general and abbreviated
where due process-like standards are concerned than its immediate predecessor in
the 1984 edition.  n68 However, the fundamental demands of a fair hearing, basic
evenhandedness among the medical staff, and openness about requisite
professional criteria and the internal  [*353]  structures of the medical staff
-- hallmarks of due process-like requirements -- are still solidly maintained in
the 1985 chapter.  The applicants for medical staff privileges or the staff
physician may not, for instance, be treated arbitrarily: "Professional criteria
specified in the medical staff bylaws and uniformly applied to all applicants or
medical staff members constitute the basis for granting initial or continuing
staff membership."  n69 Moreover, the professional criteria used in assessing
the abilities and background of the medical staff applicant or member must be
reasonably related to the primary JCAH goal of providing high quality patient
care and they must be nondiscriminatory:

   (a) The criteria are designed to assure the medical staff and governing body
that patients will receive quality care.

   (b) The criteria pertain to, at the least, evidence of current licensure,
relevant training and/or experience, current competence, and health status.

   (c) The criteria may also pertain to other reasonable qualifications, such as

   (1) the ability of the hospital to provide adequate facilities and supportive
services for the applicant and his patients;

   (2) patient care needs for additional staff members with the applicant's
skill and training;

   (3) current evidence of adequate professional liability insurance; and

   (4) the geographic location of the applicant.

   (d) Sex, race, creed, or national origin are not used in making decisions
regarding medical staff membership.  n70

   Applications for medical staff appointments must be "acted on within a
reasonable period of time" and the final decision by the governing body on each
application must also be made within "a reasonable period of time." Following an
adverse decision or recommendation regarding an applicant's request for initial
appointment, accredited hospitals must have a "mechanism . . . defined in the
governing body or the medical staff bylaws" for "appropriate action, including a
fair hearing."  n71 These same rules apply to those physicians not necessarily
seeking membership on the medical staff but rather clinical privileges at the
hospital.  n72

    [*354]  The JCAH protections apply, of course, not only to initial
applicants but also to current members of the medical staff, whose bylaws must
"include provisions for at least the following":

   2.  Fair-hearing and appellate review mechanisms, which may differ for
medical staff members and other individuals holding clinical privileges and for
applicants for such membership or privileges.

   3.  Mechanisms for corrective action, including indications and procedures
for automatic and summary suspension of an individual's medical staff membership
and/or clinical privileges.

   4.  A description of the organization of the medical staff, including
categories of medical staff membership, when such exist, and appropriate officer
positions, with the stipulation that each officer is a member of the medical
staff.  The bylaws define

   a) the method of selecting officers;

   b) the qualifications, responsibilities, and tenures of officers; and

   c) the conditions and mechanisms for removing officers from their positions.

   . . . .

   6.  A mechanism designed to assure effective communication among the medical
staff, hospital administration, and governing body.

   7.  A mechanism for adopting and amending the bylaws, rules and regulations,
and policies of the medical staff.

   . . . .

   9.  Medical staff representation and participation in any hospital
deliberation affecting the discharge of medical staff responsibilities.  n73

   By way of comparing and contrasting these JCAH standards with the
requirements of federal due process, one feature in particular of the required
bylaw characteristics listed above is the recognition that "fair-hearing and
appellate review mechanisms . . . may differ for medical staff members and other
individuals holding clinical privileges and for applicants for such membership
or privileges."  n74 In this context, "differ" obviously means less in the way
of due process-like requirements.  The question arises whether this "lesser"
standard of JCAH protection for initial applicants is the same or some different
level of procedural protection which must  [*355]  be afforded an initial
applicant who is rejected by the governing board of a public hospital subject to
the due process constraints of the fifth or fourteenth amendments.  In answering
this question, we begin with the United States Supreme Court's decision in Board
of Regents v. Roth.  n75

   In Roth, a nontenured state university instructor was not rehired, allegedly
because of his vociferous criticism of university practices.  Before considering
Roth's constitutional claims, the Court announced its now familiar standard that
the state action at issue must have deprived Roth of a protected liberty or
property interest, since fourteenth amendment due process guarantees extend only
to those state actions which can be said to deprive one of "life, liberty, or
property."  n76 Violation of a protected liberty interest requires the real
possibility of serious damage to one's individual standing and associations in
his or her community or the imposition of a stigma which would foreclose his or
her freedom to pursue other employment opportunities.  n77 The Court ruled that
because the university made no charge against Roth to damage his community
standing or to stigmatize him in such a way as to foreclose future employment,
Roth therefore had no liberty interest at stake.  n78 Meanwhile, the issue of
whether he had a property interest involved in his employment rested in turn
upon whether it could be said that his contract with the university conferred
upon him certain "specific benefits" arising to the level of a "legitimate claim
of entitlement" to them, regardless of his subjective, "unilateral
expectations."  n79 Since the provisions of Roth's employment contract called
for termination after one year of teaching service without any promise or
suggestion of reappointment, the Court found that there was no specific benefit
and hence no legitimate claim of entitlement to reemployment.  Therefore, there
was no infringement of any property interest upon the university's refusal to
renew the appointment.  n80 Nor did the Court find, apart from the express terms
of the contract, any informal policy or understanding between Roth and the
university regarding reappointment.  n81

    [*356]  In two subsequent decisions, a majority of the Court agreed that a
protected property interest is implicated if the terms of employment provide
that the employee may only be discharged for cause,  n82 but not where the
employee holds his or her position "at the will and pleasure" of the public
employer.  n83 And as regards the protected liberty interest, the Court arguably
narrowed the scope of the Roth decision to the extent that it held in Paul v.
Davis  n84 that reputation alone is not constitutionally protected.  Davis holds
that the protected liberty interest is confined rather to state action which
alters or extinguishes a previously recognized right or status.  n85

   A few illustrations may now be useful in applying Roth and its progeny to the
context of medical staff privileges.  For example, in Stretten v. Wadsworth
Veterans Hospital,  n86 a physician was terminated during a residency program
which he reasonably could have expected to complete given the hospital's past
practices (in other words, he was not employed "at will").  The Ninth Circuit
found that the physician had a protected property interest in his  [*357]
residency.  But where a physician-director of pathology was appointed by a
public hospital upon only an oral contract, absent any understanding of an
entitlement to termination for cause, the Eighth Circuit recently ruled that his
service contract was therefore at will, and that his termination by the hospital
consequently did not violate a protected property interest.  n87

   Since hospital bylaws usually provide that privileges are granted for a
stated term of one or two years,  n88 Stretten typifies the usual case that a
physician will normally have a legitimate expectation of continued employment
during any given term of appointment, while the situation of the physician whose
contract is utterly at will during such a term as discussed in the Eighth
Circuit opinion is somewhat unusual.  n89 Dismissal during a term of service in
which a physician has a legitimate expectation of continued employment must be
distinguished, however, from appointment and reappointment.  Following the end
of his or her specified term of staff appointment, a physician has no property
interest in renewal of appointment.  n90 Similarly, the physician as initial
applicant has no legitimate claim of entitlement and hence no property interest
n91  [*358]  because he or she has no constitutional right to practice medicine
in a public hospital,  n92 and because hospital administrators have broad
discretion to set professional criteria for those physicians whom they appoint
to the medical staff of the hospital.  n93

   Thus, by providing the initial applicant with a comparatively limited right
to a fair hearing and appellate review, the JCAH standards go considerably
beyond the protection of procedural due process.  But if the JCAH standards for
the medical staff purport to offer more, or at least broader, protection from an
unfair or an incorrect decision regarding a physician's staff privileges, one
might reasonably ask why these standards do not address certain specific issues
which have been litigated in staff privileges cases, such as representation by
counsel,  n94 the right to confront and  [*359]  cross-examine witnesses,  n95
notice of hearing and of charges,  n96 and possible conflicts or biases in the
composition of the governing board or medical staff tribunal which conducts a
hearing on privileges,  n97 among many others.  n98 One clear reason is that the
process  [*360]  which is due is a fluid and arguably evolving concept which is
very  [*361]  much a creature of the particular circumstances of a given case.
n99 Other than imposing broad notice and fair hearing standards, there would be
enormous difficulty and prolixity in conjuring up JCAH standards adequate to
cover all or even most of the potential specific issues that could arise once a
court decides that some process is due a physician.  Moreover, such an excessive
code would be imperious and would hardly comport with the goal of the JCAH to
set reasonable standards without requiring oppressive or even ridiculous
uniformity among the various aspects of all hospitals.  Another reason for the
brevity and generality of JCAH medical staff standards is an explicit desire on
the part of the JCAH to accommodate various differences among the diffuse case
law of different jurisdictions.  n100 For example, even among the minority of
jurisdictions which agree on the question of the quasi-public nature of the
modern private hospital, there remains significant dispute over the scope of the
physician's right to an attorney when his or her staff privileges have been or
are about to be adversely affected by the hospital.  n101 But unmistakably, the
JCAH standards on the medical staff demand that the physician receive fair and
unbiased treatment at the hands of the accredited hospital, be it public or
private.  Also, as noted previously, it purposefully avoids "technical
loopholes" in federal due process jurisprudence which, at least in some
jurisdictions, would limit the rejected physician to pursuing other remedies,
such as tortious conspiracy or antitrust.

    [*362]  IV.  The Response of Florida Courts to Statutory Imposition of JCAH
Standards

   The previous discussion impels the conclusion that the statutory imposition
of JCAH standards upon all Florida hospitals was clearly intended to overrule
the judicially created rule of absolute discretion of the private hospital to
grant, deny, or withdraw staff privileges at will.  Accordingly, we may now
evaluate whether Florida courts have understood the meaning of this statutory
mandate.

   The Second District Court of Appeal, in Moles v. White,  n102 addressed the
issue of the public-private dichotomy over one year after the passage and
effective date of section 395.065, compelling JCAH procedural standards.  n103
In Moles, two physicians who were specialists in open heart surgery applied for
medical staff privileges at the Morton F. Plant Hospital, a private institution
which was "the only facility in the Clearwater area authorized to provide open
heart surgery and supportive services."  n104 Both applicants were rejected, and
at least one of them was rejected summarily "without referral of the application
to the Credentials Committee for qualification, or to the medical staff . . .
for a recommendation."  n105 Upon rejection, the physicians sued the hospital,
its corporate owner and manager, the hospital's executive director, and three
members of its medical staff alleging "violation of state antitrust provisions,
denial of due process, restraint of trade or commerce, and breach of a fiduciary
trust and public purpose."  n106

   After dismissing their antitrust claims as not within the province of the
then current Florida antitrust statutes, the Second District also dismissed the
physicians' due process claims, relying on the Florida Supreme Court decision in
West Coast Hospital Association v. Hoare,  n107 which, it will be recalled,
affirmed the immunity of private hospitals "from adhering to the universally
recognized requirements of due process."  n108 The Moles court quoted that
portion of the Hoare decision where the Florida Supreme Court conceded that the
Florida legislature would probably have "the power and authority to regulate
private hospitals" but also noted that it  [*363]  "has not attempted to do so."
n109 The Second District then remarked, purporting to bring the Hoare decision
up to date, that "[o]ur hospital licensing laws have not been substantially
changed since before the Hoare case,"  n110 when, at least insofar as medical
staff privileges were concerned, nothing could have been further from the truth.

   It is not apparent whether the physician-appellants in Moles were aware of
section 395.065 and what it could have meant for them by providing a cause of
action to require due process-like treatment.  n111 It is, of course, fairly
arguable that the Moles court ought not be criticized too harshly for its
decision, since, with few exceptions (e.g., jurisdiction), an appellate court is
under no duty sua sponte to search out the law favorable to one side or the
other, but only to consider those arguments raised before it, and it does not
appear that the physicians even brought up the issue of section 395.065.  But
still, the Second District's loose declaration that Florida's hospital licensing
laws, particularly those dealing with the medical staff, have not changed since
before 1953 is a grossly incorrect statement which the court should have
refrained from making without sufficient knowledge of its certainty.

   The Second District repeated its grievous error in Margolin v. Morton F.
Plant Hospital Association,  n112 a case coincidentally involving the same
private hospital involved in Moles.  n113 In Margolin, a physician who was
removed from the staff of the hospital sought injunctive relief on the theory
that he had been denied procedural due process.  The Second District in a per
curiam response cited its previous opinion in Moles, along with Hoare, in noting
that the hospital was private.  n114 However, because Dr. Margolin also alleged
in his complaint that the hospital had substantially departed from its bylaws,
the Second District followed the established rule that even private hospitals
must follow their own bylaws, such that if the staff bylaws of a private
hospital provide due process-like treatment for its medical staff, these
provisions must be followed by the hospital.  n115

    [*364]  The most recent Second District opinion concerning medical staff
privileges in the context of a private hospital was Hackett v. Metropolitan
General Hospital,  n116 a case in which Dr. Hackett, a urologist, was denied
admission to the all-osteopathic medical staff of a private hospital because of
an alleged conspiracy between the hospital, through its board of trustees, and
the osteopathic physicians on its medical staff to monopolize urology practice
in favor of the one staff member practicing urology and to exclude medical
doctors from the staff for fear of their competition with osteopaths.  n117
Specifically, Dr. Hackett sued under Florida's Antitrust Act of 1980  n118 and
under the Florida law which prohibits discrimination against various medical
disciplines.  n119 The Second District ruled that Florida's antitrust laws,
which had been amended since the Moles decision, clearly encompassed restraints
upon the practice of medicine, and that Dr. Hackett's complaint was adequate to
allege a violation of section 395.0653(1), the prohibition of discrimination
against professional medical disciplines.  But the Hackett court clearly
preserved the validity of the Hoare rule which, in its words, allows private
hospitals "the right to exclude a physician . . . for any reason,"  n120 and
thus the Second District still seemed unaware that the public-private dichotomy
had been legislated out  [*365]  of existence for over seven years at the time
of its decision.  n121

   The apparently oblique message of section 395.065 was not lost upon the
Fourth District Court of Appeal, however, which delivered a highly commendable
opinion in Carida v. Holy Cross Hospital, Inc.  n122 Dr. Carida was a member of
the medical staff of Holy Cross Hospital, a private institution, who was refused
reappointment to the medical staff.  The trial court dismissed his complaint
against the hospital for compensatory and punitive damages on the authority of
the Hoare decision, notwithstanding the trial court's "apparent conclusion" that
the denial of his reappointment was occasioned by malice and effectuated through
severe procedural irregularities.  n123

   The Carida court correctly ruled that section 395.065 "did away with the
public versus private hospital distinction in denying or restricting medical
staff privileges," and accordingly the court reversed the trial court's
dismissal of the complaint.  n124 In support of this ruling, the Fourth District
quoted a portion of the then current JCAH standards on the medical staff which
then, as now, were "predicated on fairness of hearing and appellate review
mechanisms."  n125 The Carida court also noted that Florida Administrative Code
Rule 10D-28.58(2)(d), promulgated by HRS in 1977, "imposed upon all hospitals
the requirements of a hearing and thorough investigation of applications for
appointment and reappointment to medical staffs."  n126

    [*366]  Having finally extinguished the public versus private medical staff
distinction in Florida nearly a decade after section 395.065 was passed by the
Florida legislature, the Fourth District confronted the problem of that
section's grant of limited immunity, which states:

   There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any
nature shall arise against, any hospital, hospital medical staff, or hospital
disciplinary body or its agents or employees for any action taken in good faith
and without malice in carrying out the provision of this section.  n127

   Despite this section's seemingly all encompassing language, the Carida court
construed "liability" to mean "responsibility for damages proximately resulting
from a tort" and interpreted the phrase "'cause of action of any nature,' as
referring to and limited by the word 'liability.'"  n128 Because the section
requires an allegation of malice to initially overcome the immunity, the court
recognized that to construe the section "as completely eliminating any cause of
action of any nature against a hospital which gave such inadequate notice of the
reasons reappointment was not being recommended," but which did not act
maliciously in so doing, would bear the anomalous result that any nonmalicious
action taken by a hospital adverse to the privileges of one of its staff, no
matter how arbitrary, capricious or even absurd, "would go totally unanswered."
n129 Such an interpretation was viewed by the court as anathema to Florida's
constitutional guarantee of access to the state's courts for redress of injury.
n130 Thus, the Carida court concluded that section 395.065, along with Rule
10D-28.58(2)(d), allows a physician to sue in a Florida circuit court to compel
a due process-like review of the hospital's decision regarding staff privileges.
If in such a suit the physician does not seek pecuniary damages, but merely due
process-like review, malice need not be alleged or established.  If, on the
other hand, the physician desires, in addition to the due process-like review,
compensatory or punitive damages, malice must be alleged and ultimately proved.
Presumably, a physician-claimant seeking injunctive relief to compel the private
hospital to comply with its own medical staff bylaws without  [*367]  an
attendant prayer for money damages need not allege malice.  n131

   In 1982, the Florida legislature renewed its commitment to its statutory
imposition of JCAH procedural protections by extending the "sunset" expiration
n132 date of the current version of section 395.065 until 1992.  This renewed
version of the statute appears in section 395.0115  n133 with only minor changes
in the language of section 395.065.  An additional provision, however, was added
in the 1982 legislation.  n134 The new provision exempts the "proceedings and
records of committees and governing bodies" of public hospitals from exposure to
Florida's open-government, or "sunshine," laws.  n135 By, in effect, equating
the confidentiality of a public hospital's proceedings and records pertaining to
staff privileges deliberations with the secrecy of the private hospital, section
395.0115 goes even further than its predecessor in abrogating the public-private
hospital dichotomy in Florida.

   One problem which seemed to remain after Carida was the scope of the
statutorily mandated JCAH protections.  Both section 395.065 and its current
version, section 395.0115, require "good cause" limitations on adverse action
taken by the hospital against the privileges of "any staff member," but what
about the staff applicant?  Carida  [*368]  involved the termination of a staff
member's privileges only, rather than the potential staff privileges of an
initial applicant.  This apparent gap is easily closed, however, for two
reasons.  First, both the current and former versions of the statute evince a
clear legislative intent of complete and unadulterated incorporation of JCAH
procedural standards on the medical staff, which, as previously indicated,
include procedural protections for the initial applicant.  In this regard we
might also note, by way of resort to the protean principles of statutory
construction, that the term "deny," as distinguished from the terms "suspend,"
"revoke," or "curtail," is understood to mean either a denial of staff
appointment to an initial applicant or a denial of reappointment to a physician
whose term of staff membership has expired.  n136 Second, and more convincingly,
the licensing agency charged with the interpretation and enforcement of chapter
395 -- HRS -- has through its interpretation of this statute promulgated Rule
10D-28.58(2)(d)  n137 which, as the Carida court noted, requires a "hearing and
thorough investigation of applications" for either initial appointment or
reappointment to the medical staff.  n138

   These two reasons should foreclose the question of whether the applicant for
initial appointment was intended to be included in the statutory incorporation
of JCAH procedural protections.  But even if these arguments concerning the
scope of section 395.0115 are considered unpersuasive by a Florida court, the
question is still indubitably settled by virtue of new procedural protections
for initial physician-applicants to the medical staff which were enacted by the
Florida legislature in 1982.  These protections were appended onto existing
statutory provisions prohibiting professional discrimination against osteopaths,
dentists, and podiatrists.  n139 According to the 1982 amendments, the governing
board of the hospital must now "set standards and procedures to be applied by
the licensed facility and its medical staff in considering and acting upon
applications for staff membership or professional clinical privileges."  n140
And, "[t]hese standards and procedures shall be available for public
inspection."  n141 The standards or professional criteria which are set pursuant
to this requirement must clearly be  [*369]  reasonably related to the primary
hospital goal of providing high quality patient care:

   The applicant's eligibility for staff membership or professional clinical
privileges shall be determined by the applicant's background, experience,
health, training, and demonstrated competency; the applicant's adherence to
applicable professional ethics; the applicant's reputation; and the applicant's
ability to work with others and by such other elements as may be determined by
the governing board, consistent with this part.  n142

   Finally, the hospital is now required to submit in writing its reasons for
rejection of a medical staff applicant to the "applicant's respective licensing
board,"  n143 in addition to providing these reasons for denial to the applicant
within thirty days and upon written request.  n144

   Thus, any doubt which might have arisen following Carida, as to whether the
rejected applicant for staff privileges was required to be accorded certain due
process-like protections similar to those required for staff members, has been
quite commendably resolved by these 1982 amendments.

   V.  Statutory Imposition of Procedural Protections for Physicians in Other
Jurisdictions

   Florida is not unique in requiring its hospitals to comply with JCAH
procedural standards in dealings with the medical staff.  Rhode  [*370]  Island
has a substantially similar law which requires the governing board of any
licensed hospital (hence including both public and private hospitals) to comply
with JCAH procedural standards when it seeks to "suspend, deny, revoke, or
curtail" the privilege of any staff members.  n145 Presumably Rhode Island's
statutory requirement of JCAH procedural standards served to abolish a
public-private hospital dichotomy in that state, thus resolving an issue which
the Supreme Court of Rhode Island had previously left unsettled.  n146

   The California courts, as previously discussed, adopted a common law
"quasi-public" theory of the modern private hospital, thus according physicians
at private hospitals the same procedural protections available to those staff
physicians at public hospitals.  n147 The issue then arose whether a physician
could attack an adverse privileges decision of a private hospital through the
same procedural means employed by public hospital physicians.  More
specifically, the question was whether section 1094.5 of California's Code of
Civil Procedure, a provision which established a specialized review by mandate
of certain types of administrative decisions and which appeared to apply only to
administrative decisions by governmental agencies, was applicable to challenges
lodged by private hospital physicians.  The Supreme Court of California, in
Anton v. San Antonio Community Hospital,  n148 concluded: "It would be
incongruous . . . to hold that the decisions of private hospital boards, which
are required . . . to be based upon a hearing of substantially identical scope
and purport, were to be subject to some different form of review."  n149 Of
several reasons offered in support  [*371]  of this conclusion, the Anton court
took emphatic judicial notice of JCAH procedural standards on the medical staff
and of the fact that hospitals covered by the Local Hospital District Law in
California were expressly subjected to these standards by statute, not unlike
the situation in Florida.  n150 In this regard, the court noted that "the
practical necessity of securing JCAH accreditation has the effect of insuring
that substantially all hospitals in this state, whether public or private, have
bylaws governing hearing and appellate procedures which are designed to comply
with JCAH standards. . . ."  n151 Thus, "the use of the same judicial procedure
for reviewing the adjudicatory decisions of all such hospitals" was deemed by
the Anton court to be "peculiarly appropriate."  n152

   In 1972, the New York legislature enacted a statutory scheme which, among
other things, made it an "improper practice for the governing body of a hospital
" to deny staff membership or to "curtail, terminate or diminish in any way" the
professional privileges of a physician, dentist, or podiatrist "without stating
the reasons therefor, or if the reasons stated are unrelated to standards of
patient care, patient welfare, the objective of the institution or the character
or competency of the applicant."  n153 The scheme allows an aggrieved physician
to file a complaint with the New York Public Health Council, which in turn is
required to make a "prompt investigation" of the hospital's decision.  n154 If
the Council then determines that "cause exists for crediting the allegations of
the complaint," it must notify the governing body of the hospital which rendered
the decision and direct it to review its decision.  n155

    [*372]  In Fritz v. Huntington Hospital,  n156 New York's high state court
interpreted these provisions to mean that New York's previous common law rule
n157 allowing private hospitals sole discretion to exclude physicians from their
staffs for any reason was "effectively limited."  n158 The Fritz decision
involved two osteopathic physicians who were both licensed by the State of New
York and who had both completed accredited internships.  The two applied for
staff privileges at a New York private hospital, but were denied admission to
the medical staff because neither had completed an internship or residency
program approved by the American Medical Association (AMA).  Upon their
rejection they filed a complaint with the New York Public Health Council, and
the Council found that the standards of accredited osteopathic institutions were
comparable to those institutional training programs approved by the AMA.  n159
The Council therefore concluded that the hospital's adverse decisions regarding
the two applicants were not reasonably related to the goal of high quality
patient care.  But following the Council's conclusion and order of remand and
review, the private hospital again adhered to its decision.  n160 It was at that
point that the Fritz court ruled that the physicians had standing to challenge
the hospital decision in state court, because the Council's authority to do
anything in the matter had ended.  n161 On the merits, the court ruled that the
hospital had not shouldered its burden of rebutting the Public Health Council's
findings, which were presumptively  [*373]  correct, by demonstrating that AMA
approved residencies or internships were superior to their accredited
osteopathics counterparts.  n162 The Fritz court concluded:

   By this determination we do not mean to indicate that hospitals are no longer
free to be selective or that they must accept individuals licensed to practice
medicine, regardless of competency, character or institutional objectives.
However, judicial intervention is warranted where, as here, privileges are
denied without proper foundation and without proper reason, and no challenge is
made as to the actual medical credentials and capabilities of the applicants. .
. .  n163

   VI.  Conclusion

   By virtue of statutory mandate, Florida has joined those states which,
through judicial decision or by positive law, require that members or applicants
to the private hospital medical staff receive substantially the same procedural
protections accorded the public hospital staff member or applicant.  In fact,
the required protections for the initial applicant to a private hospital
significantly exceed the scope of federal due process protection available to an
initial applicant to the public hospital, since, as we have seen, the initial
applicant seldom has a protected liberty or property interest at stake.  The
public-private dichotomy in Florida, as elsewhere, amounted to little more than
an absurd legal fiction, and it is hoped that Florida courts will interpret the
new provisions of Florida law affecting physicians and hospitals correctly, as
the Carida court has done.

Legal Topics:

For related research and practice materials, see the following legal topics:
Healthcare LawBusiness Administration & OrganizationAccreditationHealthcare
LawBusiness Administration & OrganizationHospital
PrivilegesRestrictionsHealthcare LawBusiness Administration &
OrganizationJudicial ReviewGeneral Overview

FOOTNOTES:




n1.  For an excellent discussion of the symbiotic relationship between the
physician and the hospital, see Note, Health Professionals' Access to Hospitals:
A Retrospective and Prospective Analysis, 34 Vand. L. Rev. 1161, 1179 (1981).




n2.  A useful illustration of the specialist's reliance upon access to a
well-equipped hospital is the practice of open heart surgery.  See, e.g.,
Robinson v. Magovern, 521 F. Supp. 842, 855 (W.D. Pa. 1981).




n3.  Goldsmith, The Present Status of Physician Privileges, 27 Med. Trial Tech.
Q. 121, 121 (1980).

   The physician's dependence on the hospital is apparently not something
peculiar to American health care.  See, e.g., Saltsman, Physicians' Staff
Privileges in Ontario Hospitals, 8 Ottowa L. Rev. 382, 383-84 (1976) ("[a]ccess
to hospital staff appointments is of vital importance to most physicians");
Comment, Hospital Privileges: Re Macdonald and North York General Hospital, 35
U. Toronto Fac. L. Rev. 126, 128 (1977) ("hospital affiliation has become a
professional and economic necessity for the physician").




n4.  In 1977, the Florida legislature enacted a limited statutory immunity for
"peer review" participants, referred to collectively as "medical review
committees," a designation which includes the medical staff of licensed
hospitals.  Fla. Stat. § 768.40 (1983).  The statute insulates all "health care
provider" participants on the committee from any "monetary liability" to the
extent that they act in their capacity as committee members and only so long as
they operate "without malice or fraud." The statute also bars discovery of any
material used or compulsion of any testimony given during the committee
evaluation in a subsequent civil action brought by the subject of the evaluation
and review against committee participants.  An exception may be made where the
material is otherwise available and just happened to be used in the committee
proceeding or where the testimony sought relates to matters already within the
knowledge of the particular witness.

   It should be noted that the discovery bar cannot be raised to preclude such
evidence in the trial of a federal cause of action.  Feminist Women's Health
Center v. Mohammed, 586 F.2d 530, 544 n.9 (5th Cir. 1978), cert. denied, 444
U.S. 924 (1979).

   See generally Comment, Medical Peer Review Protection in the Health Care
Industry, 52 Temp. L.Q. 552 (1979); Comment, The Legal Liability of Medical Peer
Review Participants for Revocation of Hospital Staff Privileges, 28 Drake L.
Rev. 692 (1978).




n5.  See, e.g., Hackett v. Metropolitan Gen. Hosp., 422 So. 2d 986 (Fla. 2d DCA
1982).




n6.  The United States Supreme Court very recently addressed, for the first
time, the issue of the exclusive contract for medical services in Jefferson
Parish Hosp. Dist. v. Hyde, 104 S. Ct. 1551 (1984). In Hyde, the defendant
hospital had a contract with a firm of anesthesiologists requiring all
anesthesiological services for the hospital's patients to be performed by that
firm.  Because of the exclusive contract, an anesthesiologist who applied to the
hospital's medical staff was denied admission.  Following his rejection, he sued
the hospital in federal court alleging that the exclusive contract was an
illegal tying arrangement violative of the Sherman Act.  A majority of the
Court, per Justice Stevens, refused to apply the per se rule of illegality to
the tie of otherwise separate services because the record, according to the
Court, did not convincingly demonstrate that the market power of the defendant
hospital was such that the patients in the hospital's locality were "forced" to
also purchase the contracting firm's anesthesiological services.  Id. at
1566-67. Nor did the record show in the absence of per se liability that the
challenged contract unreasonably restrained competition in the market for
anesthesiological services.  Id. at 1567-68.

   See also Cardio-Medical Ass'n v. Crozer-Chester Medical Center, 721 F.2d 68
(3d Cir. 1983); Feldman v. Jackson Mem. Hosp., 571 F. Supp. 1000 (S.D. Fla.
1983); Miller v. Indiana Hosp., 562 F. Supp. 1259 (W.D. Pa. 1983); Robinson v.
Magovern, 521 F. Supp. 842 (W.D. Pa. 1981); Drexel, The Antitrust Implications
of the Denial of Hospital Staff Privileges, 36 U. Miami L. Rev. 207 (1982);
Grad, The Antitrust Laws and Professional Discipline in Medicine, 1978 Duke L.J.
443; Heitler, Health Care and Antitrust, 14 U. Tol. L. Rev. 577 (1983); Kissam,
Webber, Bigus & Holzgraefe, Antitrust and Hospital Privileges: Testing the
Conventional Wisdom, 70 Calif. L. Rev. 595 (1982).




n7.  See, e.g., Northeast Ga. Radiological Assocs. v. Tidwell, 670 F.2d 507 (5th
Cir. 1982).




n8.  See, e.g., Brandwein v. Gustman, 367 So. 2d 725 (Fla. 3d DCA 1979).




n9.  See, e.g., Pao v. Holy Redeemer Hosp., 547 F. Supp. 484 (E.D. Pa. 1982).




n10.  See, e.g., Buckner v. Lower Fla. Keys Hosp. Dist., 403 So. 2d 1025, 1027
(Fla. 3d DCA 1981) (court said that physician's pleading was "prolix,
duplicitous, scandalous, and impertinent").




n11.  Berberian v. Lancaster Osteo. Hosp. Ass'n, 149 A.2d 456 (Pa. 1959).




n12.  Campbell v. St. Mary's Hosp., 252 N.W.2d 581 (Minn. 1977).




n13.  See, e.g., Cray, Due Process Considerations in Hospital Staff Privileges
Cases, 7 Hastings Const. L.Q. 217 (1979); Horton & Mulholland, The Legal Status
of the Hospital Medical Staff, 22 St. Louis U.L.J. 485 (1978); McCall, A
Hospital's Liability for Denying, Suspending and Granting Staff Privileges, 32
Baylor L. Rev. 175 (1980); Southwick, The Hospital as an Institution --
Expanding Responsibilities Change Its Relationship with the Staff Physician, 9
Cal. W.L. Rev. 429 (1973); Comment, Physician-Hospital Conflict: The Hospital
Staff Privileges Controversy in New York, 60 Cornell L. Rev. 1075 (1975).




n14.  Because doctors were not considered employees of the hospital but rather
independent contractors, the hospital traditionally was not liable to patients
for the negligent acts or omissions of its medical staff under the theory of
respondeat superior.  Combined with charitable immunity this notion effectively
precluded recovery against the hospital for medical malpractice.  But the
arrival of Darling v. Charleston Community Mem. Hosp., 211 N.E.2d 253 (Ill.
1965), spawned the ever increasing line of cases supporting the concept of
"corporate negligence" or institutional liability.  There are significant
differences in the theoretical bases and specific applications of corporate
negligence, but essentially the doctrine refers to the independent duty of the
hospital to use reasonable care in the selection and supervision of its medical
staff, since generally the governing board and not the medical staff or one of
its subcommittees (e.g., the credentials committee) bears the ultimate
responsibility for staff privileges decisions.  See Johnson v. Misericordia
Community Hosp., 301 N.W.2d 156 (Wis. 1981), noted in Note, Johnson v.
Misericordia Community Hospital: Corporate Liability of Hospitals Arrives in
Wisconsin, 1983 Wis. L. Rev. 453; Copeland, Hospital Responsibility for Basic
Care Provided by Medical Staff Members: "Am I My Brother's Keeper?," 5 N. Ky. L.
Rev. 27 (1978); Couch, Hospital Corporate Liability for Inadequate Quality
Assurance in Pennsylvania, 2 J. Legal Med. 14 (1980); Goldberg, The Duty of
Hospitals and Hospital Medical Staffs To Regulate the Quality of Patient Care: A
Legal Perspective, 14 Pac. L.J. 55 (1982); Rubsamen, Even More Legal Controls on
the Physician's Hospital Practice, 292 New Eng. J. Med. 917 (1975); Southwick,
The Hospital's New Responsibility, 17 Clev.-Mar. L. Rev. 146 (1968); Spero,
Hospital Liability, 15 Trial 22 (1979); Walkup & Kelly, Hospital Liability:
Changing Patterns of Responsibility, 8 U.S.F.L. Rev. 247 (1973); Note, Judicial
Recognition of Hospital Independent Duty of Care to Patients: Hannola v. City of
Lakewood, 30 Clev. St. L. Rev. 711 (1981); Comment, The Hospital's
Responsibility for Its Medical Staff: Prospects for Corporate Negligence in
California, 8 Pac. L.J. 141 (1977); Note, Hospital Corporate Liability: An
Effective Solution to Controlling Private Physician Incompetence?, 32 Rutgers L.
Rev. 342 (1979); Comment, Hospital Liability for the Negligence of Physicians:
Some Needed Legal Sutures, 26 U. Fla. L. Rev. 844 (1974); Comment, The Hospital
-Physician Relationship: Hospital Responsibility for Malpractice of Physicians,
50 Wash. L. Rev. 385 (1975).

   For a practical work with "how to do it" suggestions, see Strodel, The
Impaired Physician -- Hospital Corporate Liability, 24 Trial Law.  Guide 488
(1981).

   One author argues flatly that the courts may have imposed corporate
negligence because of the "ever-broadening 'deep pocket' theory of liability,
namely, to place the burden of liability upon the party most able to absorb it.
. . .  [T]he hospital and, therefore, its insurance carrier are more capable of
bearing the loss of malpractice cases." Stanczyk, The Hospital Dilemma -- To
Staff or Not To Staff, 25 Fed'n Ins. Couns. Q. 138, 148 (1975).  A much more
principled and somewhat less cynical criticism of corporate negligence as
applied to hospitals may be found in Comment, Piercing the Doctrine of Corporate
Liability, 17 San Diego L. Rev. 383, 400 (1980), which concludes that "[t]he
most logical defendants are those physicians [on the medical staff] who are on
actual notice of the primary defendant's incompetency." The theory of shifting
away from corporate liability of the hospital in favor of holding liable
individual members of the medical staff with actual knowledge of one of their
peers' incompetency has severe practical difficulties in Florida because of
Forster v. Fishermen's Hosp., 363 So. 2d 840 (Fla. 3d DCA 1978). In Forster, the
chief of the medical staff filed suit against the hospital to challenge the
hospital's reappointment to the medical staff of "a certain physician whose
medical staff privileges had been previously revoked for unprofessionalism and
patient neglect." Id. at 841. The Third District affirmed the trial court's
dismissal for lack of standing because the board of trustees of the hospital
bore ultimate authority and responsibility to reinstate the physician, such that
the chief of staff's individual rights were not challenged.  Id.




n15.  Even in those jurisdictions where the actions of private hospitals in
dealing with their medical staffs are not considered judicially reviewable,
private hospitals must generally still follow their own bylaws; if the bylaws of
a given private hospital accord medical staff members certain procedural
protections to which they would not otherwise be legally entitled, the hospital
must provide these protections.  See Margolin v. Morton F. Plant Hosp. Ass'n,
348 So. 2d 57 (Fla. 2d DCA 1977) (court remanded for possible injunctive relief
against private hospital which violated its bylaws); Nagib v. St. Therese Hosp.,
Inc., 355 N.E.2d 211, 213 (Ill. App. Ct. 1976); McElhinney v. William Booth Mem.
Hosp., 544 S.W.2d 216, 218 (Ky. 1976) ("whether the hospital is public or
private, it must act in accordance with its charter and by-laws").  The usual
reason for this rule is that the bylaws adopted by the medical staff and
approved by the hospital constitute a binding contract between the former and
the latter.  Anne Arundel Gen. Hosp., Inc. v. O'Brien, 432 A.2d 483, 488 (Md.
Ct. Spec. App. 1981); Miller v. Indiana Hosp., 419 A.2d 1191, 1193 (Pa. Super.
Ct. 1981) (court held that hospitals are held to a "standard of strict
compliance" with their bylaws); St. John's Hosp. Medical Staff v. St. John
Regional Medical Center, 245 N.W.2d 472, 474 (S.D. 1976). But cf. Todd v.
Physicians & Surgeons Community Hosp., Inc., 302 S.E.2d 378, 383 (Ga. Ct. App.
1983) (hospital held to have an "absolute right to change the bylaws with
reference to the hospital's use by doctors"); Bello v. South Shore Hosp., 429
N.E.2d 1011, 1016 (Mass. 1981) ("[c]ontractual rights . . . do not arise upon an
application for membership but only when such application is accepted by the
corporation").




n16.  See, e.g., Ascherman v. Presbyterian Hosp., 507 F.2d 1103, 1105 (9th Cir.
1974); Ward v. St. Anthony Hosp., 476 F.2d 671, 675 (10th Cir. 1973); Sokol v.
University Hosp., Inc., 402 F. Supp. 1029, 1032 (D. Mass. 1975); Shulman v.
Washington Hosp. Center, 319 F. Supp. 252, 259-61 (D.D.C. 1970); Moore v.
Andalusia Hosp., Inc., 224 So. 2d 617, 619 (Ala. 1969); Edson v. Griffin Hosp.,
144 A.2d 341, 344 (Conn. Super. Ct. 1958); Todd v. Physicians & Surgeons
Community Hosp., Inc., 302 S.E.2d 378, 383 (Ga. Ct. App. 1983); Settler v.
Hopedale Medical Found., 400 N.E.2d 577, 579 (Ill. Ct. App. 1980); Yarnell v.
Sisters of St. Francis Health Serv., Inc., 446 N.E.2d 359, 361 (Ind. Ct. App.
1983); Natale v. Sisters of Mercy, 52 N.W.2d 701, 709 (Iowa 1952); Clark v.
Physicians & Surgeons Hosp., Inc., 121 So. 2d 752, 754 (La. Ct. App. 1960);
Levin v. Sinai Hosp., 46 A.2d 298, 301 (Md. Ct. App. 1946); Bello v. South Shore
Hosp., 429 N.E.2d 1011, 1015 (Mass. 1981); Hoffman v. Garden City Hosp.-Osteo.,
321 N.W.2d 810, 813 (Mich. Ct. App. 1982); Akopiantz v. Board of County Comm'rs,
333 P.2d 611, 613 (N.M. 1958); Ponca City Hosp., Inc. v. Murphree, 545 P.2d 738,
741 (Okla. 1976); Hagan v. Osteopathic Gen. Hosp., 232 A.2d 596, 600 (R.I.
1967); Strauss v. Marlboro County Gen. Hosp., 194 S.E. 65 (S.C. 1937); Nashville
Mem. Hosp. v. Binkley, 534 S.W.2d 318 (Tenn. 1976); Hodges v. Arlington
Neuropsychiatric Center, Inc., 628 S.W.2d 536, 538 (Tex. Ct. App. 1982); Khoury
v. Community Mem. Hosp., Inc., 123 S.E.2d 533, 539 (Va. 1962); State ex rel.
Sams v. Ohio Valley Gen. Hosp. Ass'n, 140 S.E.2d 457, 462 (W. Va. 1965).




n17.  64 So. 2d 293 (Fla. 1953).




n18.  Id. at 296-97 (quoting 41 C.J.S. Hospitals § 1 (1944)).  This definition
appears to be typical of those offered elsewhere in other jurisdictions.  See,
e.g., Shulman v. Washington Hosp. Center, 222 F. Supp. 59, 61 (D.D.C. 1963),
remanded on other grounds, 348 F.2d 70 (D.C. Cir. 1965).




n19.  Hoare, 64 So. 2d at 297-98. Lest the author be accused of hyperbole in the
use of the description "virtually unbridled discretion" above, the Florida
Supreme Court later itself declared the rule of private hospital control over
its medical staff as one of "absolute discretion" in North Broward Hosp. Dist.
v. Mizell, 148 So. 2d 1, 3 n.6 (Fla. 1962).




n20.  273 So. 2d 430 (Fla. 3d DCA 1973).




n21.  Id. at 432-33.




n22.  Sarasota County Pub. Hosp. Bd. v. Shawhay, 408 So. 2d 644, 647 (Fla. 2d
DCA 1981).




n23.  Id.




n24.  Sosa v. Board of Managers of Val Verde Mem. Hosp., 437 F.2d 173, 177 (5th
Cir. 1971).




n25.  Green v. City of St. Petersburg, 17 So. 2d 517, 518-19 (Fla. 1944).
Justice Chapman, concurring in Green, apparently took special solace in the
city's minimum physician competency rules: "It is clear that these rules close
the door against possible dope fiends, liquor heads, and practitioners not
qualified to perform major surgical operations." Id. at 520.




n26.  Bryant v. City of Lakeland, 28 So. 2d 106, 110 (Fla. 1946).




n27.  North Broward Hosp. Dist. v. Mizell, 148 So. 2d 1, 5 (Fla. 1962).




n28.  See, e.g., Anton v. San Antonio Community Hosp., 140 Cal. Rptr. 442,
448-52 (1977); Ascherman v. San Francisco Medical Soc'y, 114 Cal. Rptr. 681, 696
(Ct. App. 1974).




n29.  See, e.g., Silver v. Castle Mem. Hosp., 497 P.2d 564, 570 (Hawaii), cert.
denied, 409 U.S. 1048 (1972).




n30.  See, e.g., Guerrero v. Burlington County Mem. Hosp., 360 A.2d 334, 340
(N.J. 1976); Greisman v. Newcomb Hosp., 192 A.2d 817, 822-24 (N.J. 1963).




n31.  See Ascherman, 114 Cal. Rptr. at 695-98.




n32.  Greisman, 192 A.2d at 824 (citing Falcone v. Middlesex County Medical
Soc'y, 170 A.2d 791 (N.J. 1961)).




n33.  See, e.g., Storrs v. Lutheran Hosp. & Homes Soc'y of America, 609 P.2d 24,
28 (Alaska 1980).




n34.  See, e.g., Peterson v. Tucson Gen. Hosp., Inc., 559 P.2d 186, 191 (Ariz.
Ct. App. 1976); Hawkins v. Kinsie, 540 P.2d 345, 349 (Colo. Ct. App. 1975);
Bricker v. Sceva Speare Mem. Hosp., 281 A.2d 589, 592 (N.H.), cert. denied, 404
U.S. 995 (1971); Khan v. Suburban Community Hosp., 340 N.E.2d 398, 401-03 (Ohio
1976); Woodward v. Porter Hosp., Inc., 217 A.2d 37, 40 (Vt. 1966). But see Even
v. Longmont United Hosp. Ass'n, 629 P.2d 1100, 1103 (Colo. Ct. App. 1981) (court
stated that denial of medical staff privileges in a private hospital "is a
matter solely within the discretion of its managing authorities and is not a
proper subject of certiorari review").




n35.  Two excellent works offer well reasoned and compelling arguments in
support of common law approaches to judicial review of staff privileges
decisions by private hospitals.  See McMahon, Judicial Review of Internal Policy
Decisions of Private Nonprofit Hospitals: A Common Law Approach, 3 Am. J. Law &
Med. 149 (1977); Comment, Hospital Medical Staff: When Are Privilege Denials
Judicially Reviewable?, 11 Mich. J.L. Ref. 95 (1977).




n36.  Cray, supra note 13, at 226.  A recent publication by the Florida Hospital
Association offers the following breakdown in Florida:

   Community hospitals comprised 85.3% of Florida hospitals in 1981.  . . .
Nongovernment, not-for-profit community hospitals represented 33.7% of Florida's
hospitals and 38.5% of Florida's hospital beds.  Investor owned community
hospitals had 29% of all hospitals and 23.6% of all hospitals beds in Florida.
State and local government hospitals represented 22.6% of Florida's hospitals
and 18.3% of Florida's hospital beds.  A salient feature of Florida's hospital
industry is its healthy [no pun apparently intended] investor owned sector and
the growth that the sector has experienced from 1972 to 1981.

   Florida Hospital Association, Florida Hospitals: The Facts (2d ed. 1983).
From this very brief breakdown it is obvious that the absurdly simplistic
public-private distinction is unwarranted in Florida, notwithstanding its
perpetuation in Florida case law.




n37.  See, e.g., Schlein v. Milford Hosp., 423 F. Supp. 541, 542 (D. Conn.
1976), aff'd, 561 F.2d 427 (2d Cir. 1977) (affirming result only and disagreeing
with finding of state action).




n38.  The greatest amount of litigation concerning the question of when a
hospital is deemed to be public has revolved around the effect that the receipt
of funds under the Hospital Survey and Construction Act [42 U.S.C.A. § 291-291m
(West 1983)] has on private hospitals.  The purpose of the legislation,
popularly known as the Hill-Burton Act, is to provide states with money to
assist in the construction and modernization of public and private hospitals,
develop new and improved medical facilities and promote research.

   Cray, supra note 13, at 228-29 (footnotes omitted).

   The Hill-Burton Act was merely one component of a package of health care
legislation offered by President Truman beginning in 1946.  The major thrust of
the package was a program of national health insurance, an idea which President
Truman carried forward from the Roosevelt administration and which he
unsuccessfully sought to persuade Congress to enact during both of his terms in
office.  The American Medical Association (AMA) supported the Hill-Burton Act,
but the organization vehemently, if disingenuously, denounced national health
insurance as socialized medicine which, according to one AMA sponsored pamphlet,
would be "the keystone to the arch of the Socialist State." P. Starr, The Social
Transformation of American Medicine 285 (1982).  Indeed, in 1950 alone the AMA
"spent $ 2.25 million in its 'national education campaign' against national
health insurance." Id. at 287.




n39.  See supra note 38.




n40.  Christhif v. Annapolis Emergency Hosp. Ass'n, 496 F.2d 174, 178 (4th Cir.
1974); Simkins v. Moses H. Cone Mem. Hosp., 323 F.2d 959, 967 (4th Cir. 1963),
cert. denied, 376 U.S. 938 (1964).




n41.  The Fourth Circuit abandoned its obdurate view of the effect of
Hill-Burton funding in Modaber v. Culpeper Mem. Hosp., Inc., 674 F.2d 1023 (4th
Cir. 1982), where the court held that a private hospital which, inter alia, was
built with 55% of its construction funds coming from a Hill-Burton grant and
which accepted patients receiving Medicare and Medicaid funds, was not a state
actor for purposes of the fourteenth amendment.  Id. at 1026-27.

   All of the other federal circuits, except the First and Eleventh, which have
yet to address the issue squarely, are in accord with the revised Fourth Circuit
position.  See Loh-Seng Yo v. Cibola Gen. Hosp., 706 F.2d 306, 308 (10th Cir.
1983); Newsome v. Vanderbilt Univ., 653 F.2d 1100 (6th Cir. 1981); Hodge v.
Paoli Mem. Hosp., 576 F.2d 563, 564 (3d Cir. 1978); Musso v. Suriano, 586 F.2d
59, 62-63 (7th Cir.), cert. denied, 440 U.S. 971 (1978); Schlein v. Milford,
Inc., 561 F.2d 427, 431 (2d Cir. 1977); Madry v. Sorel, 558 F.2d 303, 305 (5th
Cir. 1977), cert. denied, 434 U.S. 1086 (1978); Briscoe v. Bock, 540 F.2d 392,
394-96 (8th Cir. 1976); Watkins v. Mercy Medical Center, 520 F.2d 894, 896 (9th
Cir. 1975).




n42.  457 U.S. 830 (1982).




n43.  457 U.S. 991 (1982).




n44.  Blum, 457 U.S. at 1002-12.




n45.  Id. at 1009.




n46.  Rendell-Baker, 457 U.S. at 839-43. Petitioner in the Rendell-Baker case, a
former counselor at the school, sued the director of the school and others under
the federal civil rights statute, 42 U.S.C. § 1983, alleging wrongful discharge
from the school in violation of her first, fifth, and fourteenth amendment
rights.  The Court held, per Chief Justice Burger, that the question of whether
the respondents acted under color of state law for purposes of § 1983 is the
"same question" posed in cases presenting the issue of state action under the
fourteenth amendment.  Rendell-Baker, 457 at 830, 837-38.

   Since Florida's own constitutional due process guarantees, Fla. Const. art.
I, § 9, are interpreted as offering merely the same and not broader protection
as their federal counterparts, the effect of the Rendell-Baker and Blum
decisions therefore controls the same issue under the state constitution.  See
South Fla. Chapter of the Assoc'd Gen. Contrs. of America, Inc. v. Metropolitan
Dade County, 552 F. Supp. 909, 928 (S.D. Fla. 1982), aff'd in part, rev'd in
part, 723 F.2d 846 (11th Cir. 1984); Florida Canners Ass'n v. Department of
Citrus, 371 So. 2d 503, 513 (Fla. 2d DCA 1979), aff'd sub nom., Coca-Cola Co.,
Food Div. v. Department of Citrus, 406 So. 2d 1079 (Fla.), appeal dismissed sub
nom., Kraft, Inc. v. Department of Citrus, 456 U.S. 1002 (1982).




n47.  Miller v. Indiana Hosp., 562 F. Supp. 1259, 1275-78 (W.D. Pa. 1983);
Taylor v. Flint Osteo. Hosp., Inc., 561 F. Supp. 1152, 1157-59 (E.D. Mich.
1983); Chico Fem. Women's Health Center v. Butte Glenn Medical Soc'y, 557 F.
Supp. 1190, 1194-97 (E.D. Cal. 1983); Pao v. Holy Redeemer Hosp., 547 F. Supp.
484, 491-92 (E.D. Pa. 1982).

   It is important to note that the Blum and Rendell-Baker decisions do not
necessarily overrule or even cast doubt on the opinions of those courts which
have ruled that private hospitals are quasi-public, see supra notes 28-35 and
accompanying text, because they, inter alia, receive Hill-Burton funds.  These
decisions are really a matter of state law dealing with such state policy
concepts as the public responsibilities of private fiduciary bodies, e.g.,
hospital boards of trustees.  See, e.g., Davidson v. Youngstown Hosp. Ass'n, 250
N.E.2d 892, 895 (Ohio Ct. App. 1969) ("the power of the [medical] staff of such
a [private] hospital to pass on staff membership applications is a fiduciary
power to be exercised reasonably and for the public good").

   Yet there is bound to be considerable confusion over this because once these
courts arrive at the quasi-public designation in order to provide private
hospital physicians with some measure of procedural protections, they invariably
speak in terms of "due process," when really no process is due at all, at least
in the federal constitutional sense.  See, e.g., Silver v. Castle Mem. Hosp.,
497 P.2d 564, 571-72 (Hawaii), cert. denied, 409 U.S. 1048 (1972). What these
courts actually mean (absent specific reliance upon state constitutional due
process guarantees broader than the fourteenth amendment), is due process-like
protections, conveniently borrowed from federal law to a designation arrived at
through a state common law policy decision.  Some courts clearly understand this
distinction.  See, e.g., Jain v. Northwest Community Hosp., 385 N.E.2d 108, 111
(Ill. App. Ct. 1978). Other courts seem utterly confounded over the difference
between analyzing the impact of Hill-Burton funding for purposes of the
fourteenth amendment and for purposes of the quasi-public designation as a
matter of state law.  See, e.g., North Valley Hosp., Inc. v. Kauffman, 544 P.2d
1219, 1221-24 (Mont. 1976); Miller v. Indiana Hosp., 419 A.2d 1191, 1194-95 (Pa.
Super. Ct. 1980).

   One very good approach for courts that wish to provide procedural protections
for private hospital physicians while avoiding the muddle over the quasi-public
analysis is to interpret the relevant state constitutional provision dealing
with due process more broadly than its federal counterparts in the fifth and
fourteenth amendments.  For a discussion of how a growing number of state courts
are finding real substance in their respective constitutions as a refreshing
alternative (which even comports with the so-called "New Federalism") to
mindlessly following federal constitutional interpretations jot for jot and case
by case, see generally Collins, Rebirth of Reliance on State Charters, Nat'l Law
J., Mar. 12, 1984, at 25.




n48.  See Fla. Stat. § 395.065 (1975) (repealed 1982).




n49.  See infra text accompanying notes 132-35.




n50.  Fla. Stat. § 395.0115 (1983) provides in relevant part:

   (1) The governing board of any licensed facility, after considering the
recommendations of its medical staff, is authorized to suspend, deny, revoke, or
curtail the staff privileges of any staff member for good cause, including, but
not limited to:

   (a) Incompetence.

   (b) Negligence.

   (c) Being found to be a habitual user of intoxicants or drugs to the extent
that he is deemed dangerous to himself or others.

   (d) Being found liable for medical malpractice by a court of competent
jurisdiction.

   (e) Mental or physical impairment which may adversely affect patient care.

   However, the procedures for such actions shall comply with the standards
outlined by the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Hospitals, the American
Osteopathic Association, the Accreditation Association for Ambulatory Health
Care, and the "Medicare/Medicaid Conditions of Participation."

   (2) There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any
nature shall arise against, any licensed facility, its governing body and
governing body members, medical staff, or disciplinary body, or its agents or
employees for any action taken in good faith and without malice in carrying out
the provisions of this section.




n51.  Id.




n52.  Id.  See Jost, The Joint Commission on Accreditation of Hospitals: Private
Regulation of Health Care and the Public Interest, 24 B.C.L. Rev. 835 (1983).




n53.  Fla. Stat. § 395.0115(2) (1983).




n54.  Jost, supra note 52, at 841-42.




n55.  Id. at 842-43.




n56.  Id.




n57.  Id. at 842.




n58.  Id. at 843.




n59.  Id. at 843, 852-57.




n60.  Id. at 844.  JCAH accreditation is very important for a hospital's
"standing in the professional community" and its "public image." See American
Int'l Hosp. v. Chicago Tribune, 458 N.E.2d 1305, 1308 (Ill. App. Ct. 1983) (
hospital sued the JCAH and the Tribune alleging a false report of JCAH's refusal
to accredit the hospital).




n61.  Fla. Stat. § 395.006(2)(a) (1983).




n62.  Id. § 395.002(1).




n63.  Id. § 395.006(2)(a).




n64.  Jost, supra note 52, at 923.  After an extensive overview of the JCAH, the
balance of Professor Jost's article is a critical and comprehensive analysis of
the pros and cons of private regulation of health care offered by the JCAH,
particularly from a public interest and macroeconomic perspective.




n65.  Fla. Stat. § 395.065(1) (1975).




n66.  Joint Committee on Accreditation of Hospitals, Accreditation Manual for
Hospitals 89 (1984) [hereinafter cited as Manual].




n67.  The JCAH once promulgated its Guidelines for the Formulation of Medical
Staff Bylaws, Rules, and Regulations (1971), which still is cited as
authoritative by otherwise excellent works, see, e.g., Cray, supra note 13, at
251 n.202, but which is considered obsolete by the JCAH.




n68.  The Medical Staff Standards for the 1985 edition of the Accreditation
Manual for Hospitals [hereinafter cited as Standards] were approved by the JCAH
Board of Commissioners on December 10, 1983.  See JCAH Board Approves New
Medical Staff Standards, 4 JCAH Perspectives, Jan.-Feb. 1984, at 1.




n69.  Standards, supra note 68, at 2.




n70.  Id.




n71.  Id. at 2-3.




n72.  Id. at 8-11.




n73.  Id. at 4.




n74.  Id. (emphasis added).




n75.  408 U.S. 564 (1972).




n76.  U.S. Const. amend. XIV, § 1.




n77.  Roth, 408 U.S. at 573.




n78.  Id. at 573-74.




n79.  Id. at 576-77.




n80.  Id. at 578.




n81.  In the companion case of Perry v. Sindermann, 408 U.S. 593, 599-602
(1972), the Court ruled that where Perry was rehired annually in the absence of
a formal tenure system, he nevertheless had a legitimate claim of entitlement to
renewal of his employment contract because of a de facto tenure system
predicated upon university practices and explicit understandings between the
faculty and the administration.




n82.  Six members of the Court (i.e., Justices Powell and Blackmun concurring
and dissenting, Justice White concurring and dissenting, along with Justices
Brennan, Douglas, and Marshall dissenting separately) in Arnett v. Kennedy, 416
U.S. 134 (1974), concluded that an entitlement to dismissal for cause is a
protected property interest.




n83.  Bishop v. Wood, 426 U.S. 341, 345 n.8 (1976).




n84.  424 U.S. 693 (1976).




n85.  Id. at 711-12.




n86.  537 F.2d 361, 366-67 (9th Cir. 1976). The Stretten court also held that
the physician's untimely termination, with accompanying reasons therefor, did
not, however, implicate a protected liberty interest because "[l]iberty is not
infringed by a label of incompetence," though liberty is infringed by a "stigma
of moral turpitude." Id. at 366.

   On the other hand, the Supreme Court of Washington ruled that a physician who
was terminated from a public hospital during a term of his one-year renewable
staff appointment did not have a protected property interest in the remainder of
his term of appointment.  Ritter v. Board of Comm'rs, 637 P.2d 940, 944 (Wash.
1981). The effect of the court's ruling was that Dr. Ritter was an at will
member of the medical staff notwithstanding the fact that he "could assume he
would remain a member of the hospital staff absent cause for dismissal, and he
was protected by extensive procedural protections established by the medical
staff bylaws [which were violated in his case]." Id. at 944. The majority in
Ritter cited Suckle v. Madison Gen. Hosp., 499 F.2d 1364 (7th Cir. 1974), in
support of this proposition.  But Suckle is crucially different in that the
issue of whether a property interest existed there involved a denial of
reappointment rather than termination during a term of service.  Id. at 1365.
The Suckle court concluded that absent some legitimate expectation of renewal,
such as in Perry v. Sindermann, 408 U.S. 593 (1972), the physician had no
property interest in reappointment.  The lone dissenting justice in Ritter
emphasized this crucial distinction, and it is submitted that his view is
correct on this point.  See Ritter, 637 P.2d at 951 (Dore, J., Dissenting).




n87.  Englestad v. Virginia Mun. Hosp., 718 F.2d 262, 266 (8th Cir. 1983).




n88.  Cray, supra note 13, at 237.




n89.  Englestad, 718 F.2d at 266.




n90.  Cray, supra note 13, at 237.




n91.  Id.  Remarkably, the Fifth Circuit, after correctly noting the rule that
"physicians obtain by mere licensure no constitutional right to staff privileges
at any particular hospital," went on to assume without discussion that a thrice
rejected applicant was entitled to procedural due process following his
rejection by a public hospital.  Truly v. Madison Gen. Hosp., 673 F.2d 763, 765
(5th Cir.), cert. denied, 103 S. Ct. 214 (1982).

   Even more bizarre is the decision in Shaw v. Hospital Auth., 614 F.2d 946
(5th Cir. 1980), where the same circuit (Judge Brown was the only judge common
to both panels, however) issued a per curiam affirmance of a lower court opinion
which was in turn decided upon remand from the Fifth Circuit's earlier opinion
in Shaw v. Hospital Auth., 507 F.2d 625 (5th Cir. 1975). The Shaw cases arose
out of a denial of an application for an initial grant of staff privileges to a
podiatrist by a public hospital.  Id. at 627. The earlier Fifth Circuit opinion
held that the podiatrist "in seeking staff privileges at . . . [the] hospital,
seeks to engage in his occupation as a podiatrist and this is a [protected]
liberty interest." Id. at 628. On remand from this opinion, the lower court
"corrected" itself and stated that it was "clear in the first instance" that the
podiatrist's application invoked a liberty interest "emanating from his state
created right to practice podiatry." Shaw, 614 F.2d at 950 (lower court opinion
is appended to per curiam affirmance).

   Thus, the Shaw opinions equate a mere denial of staff privileges, without
more (and from only one hospital), as an affront to the legitimate liberty
interest to pursue one's occupation.  But the denial of the podiatrist's
application in the Shaw situation did not in any way alter or extinguish Dr.
Shaw's state created right to practice podiatry.  His license was unaffected by
the decision of the governing board of any hospital upon his mere application.
The liberty interest in pursuing one's chosen vocation discussed in the United
States Supreme Court opinion relied upon by the Fifth Circuit, Shaw, 507 F.2d at
628, dealt with a Nebraska statute which totally forbade throughout the state
the teaching in any private or public school of any language other than English
to any child who had not successfully completed the eighth grade.  Meyer v.
Nebraska, 262 U.S. 390, 397-98 (1923). As regards Dr. Shaw, the scenario
envisioned by Meyer and its progeny would occur only if, for instance, a state
examining board suspended his right to practice podiatry at any hospital.  See
Withrow v. Larkin, 421 U.S. 35 (1975); Ampuero v. Department of Prof. Reg., 410
So. 2d 213, 214 (Fla. 3d DCA 1982) (in response to the failure of the Department
to grant a doctor a hearing within six months of an order prohibiting him from
prescribing certain drugs, the court stated: "When the state undertook to
temporarily restrict the petitioner's privilege to practice medicine it had an
affirmative duty to grant a post-suspension hearing and one that would be
concluded without appreciable delay.").

   Not only was Dr. Shaw still free to practice his chosen field of podiatry, he
was already a member of the medical staff of two private hospitals at the time
he filed his complaint.  Shaw, 507 F.2d at 626. It appears, therefore, that the
Shaw cases are substantially incorrect in not distinguishing between "reduced
economic returns" and "permanent exclusion from, or protracted interruption of,
gainful employment." Stretten v. Wadsworth Veterans Hosp., 537 F.2d 361, 366
(9th Cir. 1976).




n92.  Hayman v. City of Galveston, 273 U.S. 414, 416-17 (1927).




n93.  Sosa v. Board of Managers of Val Verde Mem. Hosp., 437 F.2d 173, 177 (5th
Cir. 1971).




n94.  The Supreme Court of New Jersey has opted for what appears thus far to be
the minority view: "In view of the physician's substantial interest in
proceedings of this nature, on balance we believe that the physician should have
the right to have counsel present at mandated hospital hearings with respect to
his application for admission to the staff." Garrow v. Elizabeth Gen. Hosp., 401
A.2d 533, 542 (N.J. 1979).

   The Supreme Court of Hawaii adopted a somewhat contrary view:

   It should be within the discretion of the hospital board as to whether
counsel may attend the hearing and participate in the proceedings.
Participation by counsel would probably not be necessary unless the hospital's
attorney is used in the proceedings or the extreme nature of the charges
involved indicated that representation by an attorney would be advantageous.

   Silver v. Castle Mem. Hosp., 497 P.2d 564, 571-72 (Hawaii), cert. denied, 409
U.S. 1048 (1972). The Supreme Court of California is in accord with the Silver
view.  See Anton v. San Antonio Community Hosp., 140 Cal. Rptr. 442, 457 (1977).
Insofar as the board's discretion on this point is concerned, "[a]n abuse of
discretion should be automatically found where the physician was denied counsel
but there was a hearing officer who was an attorney since such a denial is
patently unfair." Cray, supra note 13, at 254.

   The 1984 JCAH chapter on the Medical Staff states that the medical staff
bylaws should specify "the role, if any, of legal counsel." See Manual, supra
note 66, at 99.  The 1985 Medical Staff Standards, however, are silent on the
role of the attorney.  See Standards, supra note 68, at 4.




n95.  Owing to the rule that administrative proceedings dealing with medical
staff privileges "need not be conducted as full blown trials," Christhilf v.
Annapolis Emergency Hosp. Ass'n, 496 F.2d 174, 179 (4th Cir. 1974),
cross-examination therefore "need not be a part of every hearing in order to
satisfy due process." Woodbury v. McKinnon, 447 F.2d 839, 844 (5th Cir. 1971).
"Whether [cross-examination] is required depends upon the circumstances." Id.
Thus, where the hospital board or the medical staff conducting the hearing has
no subpoena power, "there can be no right to confront and cross-examine persons
who have made adverse statements of a doctor unless such persons testify at the
hearing." Silver v. Castle Mem. Hosp., 497 P.2d at 571. See Koelling v. Board of
Trustees, 146 N.W.2d 284, 294 (Iowa 1966). Similarly, where there were no
witnesses appearing at the hearing because, for instance, it consisted of an
"informal discussion by the medical staff" of the charges against the physician,
procedural due process is not offended.  Woodbury, 447 F.2d at 844. See Kaplan
v. Carney, 404 F. Supp. 161, 164 (E.D. Mo. 1975).




n96.  Due process requires that the physician be notified that a hearing is
available to him and that such notice be timely to allow adequate defense
preparation.  Silver v. Castle Mem. Hosp., 497 P.2d at 571. See Christhilf, 496
F.2d at 177-78.

   With respect to notice of charges, written notice of specific reasons for
denial of privileges, including descriptions of a physician's recent activities,
satisfies procedural due process requirements.  A physician may not require that
notice of charges be so specific that it amounts to the pleading of evidence;
although more particularization might help the physician it is not
constitutionally required.  Truly v. Madison Gen. Hosp., 673 F.2d at 766. Thus,
where a physician was "charged in writing with lack of competence and judgment
to perform surgery and surgical procedures," accompanied by a list of the names
of specific cases and the hospital records thereto, notice of charges was
sufficient even though the physician's request for separate allegations of the
"exact nature of the fault in each case" was denied by the hospital.  Woodbury,
447 F.2d at 843-44. The courts have consistently eschewed any requirement that
the notice of charges be so exact and detailed so as to resemble, for instance,
a criminal indictment.  Id.  The question is simply whether the notice of
charges sufficiently affords the physician with an opportunity to answer and
prepare an informed defense.  See Klinge v. Lutheran Charities Ass'n, 523 F.2d
56, 62 (8th Cir. 1975); Sosa, 437 F.2d at 176; Silver v. Castle Mem. Hosp., 497
P.2d at 571; Miller v. Indiana Hosp., 419 A.2d 1191, 1193-94 (Pa. Super. Ct.
1980).




n97.  A fair hearing before an unbiased tribunal is essential to due process.
Duffield v. Charleston Area Medical Center, 503 F.2d 512, 517 (4th Cir. 1974).
In our context this means that a physician is "entitled to have his case judged
by fair minded doctors who . . . [are] able and willing to . . . decide the case
with 'good faith objectivity.'" Klinge v. Lutheran Charities Ass'n, 523 F.2d 56,
63 (8th Cir. 1975). But the physician is not "entitled to a panel made up of
doctors who had never heard of the case and who knew nothing about the facts of
it or what they supposed the facts to be." Id.  In Duffield, a physician
challenged as violative of due process the fact that certain members of the
hospital's Joint Conference Committee, which was the final arbiter of staff
privileges decisions, had also sat on the Governing Board which rendered a
decision adverse to the physician.  The court ruled that this fact alone did not
necessarily indicate unfair bias, which "must stem from an extrajudicial source
and result in an opinion on the merits on some basis other than what the judge
learned from his participation in the case." Duffield, 503 F.2d at 517. In
support of this holding, the United States Supreme Court has ruled, in a case
involving suspension of a physician's license by a state examining board, that
it is not necessarily a violation of due process for the same agency or body to
perform both an investigative hearing and then ultimately an adjudicative
hearing.  Withrow v. Larkin, 421 U.S. 35, 47-52 (1975). Participants in a later
hearing need not be disqualified "simply because they have been exposed to
evidence presented in non-adversary investigative procedures that were followed
prior to the adversary hearing." Klinge, 523 F.2d at 63. Hence, where a
physician was a witness before a medical hearing committee and was subsequently
also a member of an appellate review body passing upon a staff privileges
recommendation, there was no automatic bias shown; in fact, such illegal bias
must be affirmatively shown by the aggrieved physician alleging it.  Ritter v.
Board of Comm'rs, 637 P.2d 940, 946-47 (Wash. 1981). Similarly, in Ladenheim v.
Union County Hosp. Dist., 394 N.E.2d 770 (Ill. App. Ct. 1979), the fact that a
physician-member of the Credentials Committee assisted the hospital attorney in
the preparation of charges against an accused physician did not, absent a
showing of unfair bias from an extrajudicial source resulting in an opinion on
the merits, infringe upon the charged physician's due process rights.  Id. at
774.




n98.  An example of one surprisingly recurring problem for hospitals is the
disruptive physician.  The Ninth Circuit described this problem well:

   A hospital staff is highly interdependent, both in the sense that one doctor
depends upon the professional skill of other doctors and in the sense that the
collegial nature of the body makes tolerable working relationships an absolute
prerequisite to effective staff performance.  The necessity for a healthy
working relationship is a function of the nature of the work to be done.
Incompatible workers on farms, ranches, or in certain types of factories can
function reasonably well although even there it is doubtful that full efficiency
is achieved.  Effective performance by physicians on the staff of a hospital,
whose tasks require a high degree of cooperation, concentration, creativity, and
the constant exercise of professional judgment, requires a greater degree of
compatibility.

   Stretten v. Wadsworth Veterans Hosp., 537 F.2d 361, 368 (9th Cir. 1976).
Numerous other courts have allowed the hospital wide latitude in requiring that
the physician not be a disruptive force.  See, e.g., Truly v. Madison Gen.
Hosp., 673 F.2d at 765 n.4 (upholding reasonableness of hospital's finding of
doctor's "probable inability to work with administration and staff"); Laje v. R.
E. Thomason Gen. Hosp., 564 F.2d 1159, 1162 (5th Cir. 1977) (allowing
consideration of "ability to function smoothly in a hospital setting" as
legitimate evaluation criterion); Robinson v. Magovern, 521 F. Supp. 842, 918
(W.D. Pa. 1981) (doctor's "alleged inability to work harmoniously with his
fellow surgeons, the residents and the support personnel could have had an
impact on the hospital's effort to achieve its primary objective . . . [of]
outstanding patient care"); Schlein v. Milford Hosp., 423 F. Supp. 541, 544 (D.
Conn. 1976) ("it is entirely consistent with due process for a hospital . . . to
evaluate those personal qualities of a physician that reasonably relate to his
ability to function effectively within a hospital environment"); Ritter v. Board
of Comm'rs, 637 P.2d 940, 948 (Wash. 1981) (bylaw requirement of "ability to
cooperate and satisfactorily relate with others . . . is . . . rationally
related to the effective functioning of a hospital"); Ladenheim v. Union County
Hosp. Dist., 394 N.E.2d 770, 776 (Ill. Ct. App. 1979) (physician's "inability to
work with other members of the hospital staff was in itself sufficient grounds
to deny him staff privileges"); Theissen v. Watonga Mun. Hosp. Bd., 550 P.2d
938, 940 (Okla. 1976) ("problems in getting along with other members of the
Staff" constitute sufficient basis to deny staff privileges); Huffaker v.
Bailey, 540 P.2d 1398, 1400 (Or. 1975) ("ability to work smoothly with others is
reasonably related to hospital's object of ensuring patient welfare").  But see
Miller v. Eisenhower Medical Center, 166 Cal. Rptr. 826, 837 (1980), where the
Supreme Court of California took a much more restrictive view, and said that
rejection of an otherwise qualified physician from the medical staff was
precluded

   unless it can be shown that [a physician] manifests an inability to "work
with others" in the hospital setting which, by reason of its particular
character, presents a real and substantial danger that patients treated by him .
. . might receive other than a "high quality of medical care" if he were
admitted to membership.




n99.  In Mathews v. Eldridge, 424 U.S. 319 (1976), Justice Powell, writing for
the majority, set out the three factors which must be considered in deciding
what particular elements of process are due:

   First, the private interest that will be affected by the official action;
second, the risk of an erroneous deprivation of such interest through the
procedures used, and the probable value, if any, of additional or substitute
procedural safeguards; and finally, the Government's interest, including the
function involved and the fiscal and administrative burdens that the additional
or substitute procedural requirement would entail.

Id. at 335.




n100.  Telephone interview with Dr. Becker of the JCAH Staff on Standards (Mar.
11, 1984).




n101.  See supra note 94.




n102.  336 So. 2d 427 (Fla. 2d DCA 1976).




n103.  See Fla. Stat. § 395.065(1) (1975) (repealed 1982).




n104.  Moles, 336 So. 2d at 429.




n105.  Id.




n106.  Id.




n107.  64 So. 2d 293 (Fla. 1953). See supra notes 17-19 and accompanying text.




n108.  Moles, 336 So. 2d at 429.




n109.  Id.




n110.  Id.




n111.  The Moles court dismissed the other contentions of the physicians having
to do with their restraint of trade and quasi-public arguments.  Id. at 429-31.




n112.  348 So. 2d 57 (Fla. 2d DCA 1977).




n113.  Indeed, the private hospital involved in both the Moles and Margolin
decisions was, incredibly, the same hospital involved over a generation earlier
in the Hoare opinion.




n114.  Margolin, 348 So. 2d at 57.




n115.  See supra note 15.




n116.  422 So. 2d 986 (Fla. 2d DCA 1982).




n117.  Id. at 987.




n118.  Fla. Stat. ch. 542 (1981).




n119.  Fla. Stat. § 395.0653 (1981).  This section was originally enacted in
1979 to abrogate prior holdings which allowed even public hospitals to
discriminate against osteopaths, podiatrists, or dentists in staff privileges
decisions merely on the basis of prejudice against these professions per se.
See Richardson v. City of Miami, 198 So. 51 (Fla. 1940); Taylor v. Horn, 189 So.
2d 198 (Fla. 2d DCA 1966).

   Section 395.0653, as amended up to 1981, prohibited any hospital from
refusing to grant staff or clinical privileges "solely because" the applicant
was licensed as an osteopath, dentist, or a podiatrist.  Fla. Stat. §
395.0653(1) (1981).  Moreover, hospitals were required to consider each
applicant, whether medical doctor or podiatrist, for instance, "on an individual
basis pursuant to criteria applied equally to all other disciplines." Id. §
395.0653(2).  The term "disciplines" refers to "different fields of licensure
rather than the narrower classifications within one of the disciplines."
Sarasota County Pub. Hosp. Bd. v. Shahawy, 408 So. 2d 644, 646 (Fla. 2d DCA
1982). Thus, requiring a medical doctor who is not board certified by the
American Board of Cardiovascular Diseases to demonstrate the higher standard of
being "unusually qualified" because of the applicant's lack of certification is
not discriminatory within the meaning of this statute because board
certification refers to a classification within the discipline of doctor of
medicine.  Id.

   These prohibitions against professional discrimination were carried over by
the 1982 Florida legislative session into the new statute, Fla. Stat. § 395.011
(1983).  This new section expanded the protection given to professional
disciplines in several respects, which shall be discussed above in the text.




n120.  Hackett, 422 So. 2d at 988.




n121.  The Third District Court of Appeal demonstrated its awareness of §
395.065 in Buckner v. Lower Fla. Keys Hosp. Dist., 403 So. 2d 1025, 1028 (Fla.
3d DCA 1981). But the Buckner case involved a physician's suit against a public
hospital, and therefore the issue of the intended effects of § 395.065 upon the
public-private dichotomy did not arise.




n122.  427 So. 2d 803 (Fla. 4th DCa 1983).




n123.  Id. at 805. The procedural irregularities stemmed from the hospital's
blatant failure to follow its own bylaws as well as from certain alleged due
process violations in the form of insufficient notice and denial of
cross-examination.




n124.  Id.




n125.  Id. (footnote omitted).




n126.  Id. at 806 (footnote omitted).  HRS, as the statutorily designated
"licensing agency" for ch. 395, Florida Statutes, titled "Hospital Licensing and
Regulation," Fla. Stat. § 395.01(4) (1977), promulgated Fla. Admin. Code R.
10D-28.58(2)(d) pursuant to its rulemaking authority accorded by Fla. Stat. §
395.07 (1977).  The rule requires:

   Review of all applications for appointment and annual reappointment to all
categories of the medical staff, and recommendations on each to the hospital's
governing authority, including delineation of privileges to be granted in each
case, and right of hearing and appeal.  Recommendation to the governing body for
withdrawal of any privileges of a member of the medical staff or dismissal from
the medical staff will be made only after a thorough investigation by the
medical staff or a committee thereof, with the subject member being given the
right of hearing before the medical staff or a committee thereof.




n127.  Fla. Stat. § 395.065(2) (1975).




n128.  Carida, 427 So. 2d at 806 n.6.




n129.  Id.




n130.  Id.  See Fla. Const. art. I, § 21.




n131.  Cf. Palm Beach-Martin County Medical Center v. Panaro, 431 So. 2d 1023
(Fla. 4th DCA 1983) (court recognized the right of injunctive relief against a
private hospital to compel compliance with its own bylaws, citing Carida, with
no mention of necessity of pleading malice).




n132.  See Fla. Stat. §§ 11.61, 395.0115 n.1 (1983).




n133.  Fla. Stat. § 395.0115 (1983).




N134.  Fla. Stat. § 395.0115(3) (1983) states:

   The proceedings and records of committees and governing bodies which relate
solely to actions taken in carrying out the provisions of this section shall not
under any circumstances be subject to inspection under the provisions of chapter
119; nor shall meetings held pursuant to achieving the objectives of such
committees and governing bodies be open to the public under the provisions of
chapter 286.




n135.  See Fla. Stat. chs. 119, 286 (1983).  Fla. Stat. § 395.0115(3) (1983)
will have a preemptive effect on future decisions which might otherwise have
followed the lead of Gadd v. News-Press Pub. Co., 412 So. 2d 894 (Fla. 2d DCA
1982). The Gadd ruling allowed a newspaper to have access to the personnel files
of present and past physicians at a public hospital, as well as access to the
minutes and other documents relating to the activities of the hospital's
utilization review committee of the medical staff, all pursuant to ch. 119,
Florida Statutes.  The Second District rejected the hospital's argument that the
statutory imposition of JCAH standards forbade such access because those
standards require confidentiality.  The Second District, which as we have seen
has been impervious to the message of § 395.065, concluded: "Simply requiring
compliance with the standards of the JCAH, in our opinion, does not create an
exemption or confidentiality 'provided by law.'" Gadd, 412 So. 2d at 896
(emphasis in original).




n136.  See Cray, supra note 13, at 236-38; McCall, supra note 13, passim.




n137.  See supra note 126.




n138.  Carida, 427 So. 2d at 806.




n139.  See supra note 119.




n140.  Fla. Stat. § 395.011(4) (1983).




n141.  Id.




n142.  Id. § 395.011(3).




n143.  Id. § 395.011(5).  The requirement that the hospital report its reasons
for denial to the applicant's licensing board seems to dovetail with the
separate statutory requirement that hospitals must report the "suspension or any
other disciplinary action" taken by the hospital, its medical staff, or peer
review group against a member of the medical staff.  See id. § 458.337.

   With respect to the earlier discussion in note 91 (concerning the fact that a
mere rejection by a public hospital of an initial applicant for staff
privileges, without more, did not infringe upon the applicant's liberty interest
to pursue his or her chosen occupation), it was emphasized that, absent some
sort of charge, the applicant's license to practice medicine was unaffected by
the rejection of any given hospital.  But the requirement of § 395.011(5) that
the reasons for denial must be submitted to the applicant's licensing board
would seem to directly affect the status of his or her license.  Hence, it would
also infringe upon a protected liberty interest such that if a mere rejection by
a public hospital in Florida, notwithstanding the statutory due process-like
protections now in place, did not previously implicate procedural due process
because the requisite infringement upon the applicant's liberty interest was
lacking, it now seems almost certain that a mere rejection in Florida of such an
application implicates a protected liberty interest per se.




n144.  Id. § 395.011(5).




n145.  R.I. Gen. Laws § 23-17-23 (1979 & Supp. 1983).




n146.  Hagan v. Osteopathic Gen. Hosp., 232 A.2d 596, 600 (R.I. 1967).




n147.  See supra notes 28 & 31 and accompanying text.




n148.  140 Cal. Rptr. 442 (1977).




n149.  Id. at 450 (emphasis in original).  The situation in Florida at this
juncture is very similar to the one which was addressed in Anton.  That is, to
the extent that even though the public-private dichotomy has been abolished
where the right to procedural protections is concerned, there are still two
distinct methods of challenging a hospital's adverse privileges decision,
depending upon whether it is a private or public institution.  Since public
hospitals are not considered administrative agencies within the meaning of
Florida's Administrative Procedure Act, see Fla. Stat. § 120.52 (1983) and
Siddeeq v. Tallahassee Mem. Hosp., 364 So. 2d 99, 100 (Fla. 1st DCA 1978), the
quasi-judicial decisions of their governing boards affecting one's staff
privileges are usually challenged in the state courts by means of a common law
writ of certiorari in the circuit court.  Fla. R. App. P. 9.030(c).  The circuit
court's scope of certiorari review is to determine whether the hospital's
governing board departed from the essential requirements of law and whether its
decision was supported by competent substantial evidence.  De Groot v.
Sheffield, 95 So. 2d 912, 915-16 (Fla. 1957); McCray v. County of Volusia, 400
So. 2d 511, 512 (Fla. 5th DCA 1981). The decision of the circuit court reviewing
the quasi-judicial decision of the governing board is in turn reviewable by the
district court of appeal also through a writ of certiorari, and not by way of
appeal.  City of Deerfield Beach v. Vaillant, 419 So. 2d 624, 626 (Fla. 1982);
Fla. R. App. P. 9.030(b)(2)(B).

   Because both the Carida decisions and the 1982 statutory amendments affecting
physician-applicants to the medical staff are so recent, the procedural methods
for review of a decision of the governing board of a private hospital with
respect to staff privileges are still uncertain.  Presumably such review will be
by way of a suit for injunctive relief and/or damages filed within the original
jurisdiction of the circuit court and not by means of the discretionary writ of
certiorari.  It is of course possible, however, that the Florida Rules of
Appellate Procedure regarding common law writs of certiorari could be construed
as covering the quasi-judicial decisions of private hospital governing boards,
similar to the conclusion reached on the same issue in Anton.




n150.  Anton, 140 Cal. Rptr. at 451.




n151.  Id.




n152.  Id. at 452.




n153.  N.Y. Pub. Health Law § 2801-b(1) (McKinney 1977 & Supp. 1983).




n154.  Id. § 2801-b(2) to (3).




n155.  Id.




n156.  384 N.Y.S.2d 92 (1976).




n157.  See, e.g., Leider v. Beth Israel Hosp. Ass'n, 227 N.Y.S.2d 900 (1962);
Van Campen v. Olean Gen. Hosp., 147 N.E. 219 (N.Y. 1925). In an unusual case the
common law barrier could be set aside where both the economic necessity of the
privileges to the physician and the monopoly power of the hospital were
demonstrated.  See Salter v. New York State Psychological Ass'n, 248 N.Y.S.2d
867 (1964); Moss v. Albany Medical Center Hosp., 403 N.Y.S.2d 568 (App. Div.
1978).




n158.  Fritz, 384 N.Y.S.2d at 96.




n159.  Id. at 95.




n160.  Id.




n161.  In a subsequent case, the New York Court of Appeals refined its view of
the procedural requirements of § 2801-b.  If, upon remand from the Public Health
Council, the hospital still maintains its adverse position regarding the
applicant's request for staff privileges, the next step for the physician is to
file an action pursuant to N.Y. Pub. Health Law § 2801-c (McKinney 1977 & Supp.
1983) "to enjoin the hospital from discriminating against or unjustly denying
professional privileges or staff membership in violation of section 2801-b of
the Public Health Law." Cohoes Mem. Hosp. v. Department of Health, 424 N.Y.S.2d
110, 113 (1979). In the injunction action, the lower court reviews the
privileges controversy de novo in a hearing in which the findings of the Public
Health Council are admissible "only to the extent that [they serve] as prima
facie evidence of any fact or facts found therein." Id. at 113. It is only at
this point that the § 2801-c hearing decision is subject to appellate review at
the request of either the hospital or the physician.  Id.




n162.  Fritz, 384 N.Y.S.2d at 98.




n163.  Id. at 98-99.


